Massachusetts, session 194th, H2263.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 10 of Chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first sentence ending in the words "such
ordinance or by-law", line number 15, the following:-
All meeting notifications, publications, mailings, and postings to all parties in interest as
prescribed in this section and in section eleven shall be required for each public hearing held
subsequent to the initial public hearing.
of 1